New Jersey, session 222, A653.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to any other penalties imposed, a court may assess the value of any services provided and any costs or expenses incurred by a public entity, including but not limited to law enforcement and emergency medical services, arising from or associated with the recovery or rescue of a person, and the persons pet or property if applicable, if the person is guilty of: a.     criminal mischief, pursuant to N.J.S.2C:17-3; and b.    (1)  reckless driving, pursuant to R.S.39:4-96; (2)   careless driving, pursuant to R.S.39:4-97; or (3)   driving or operating a motor vehicle in an unsafe manner, pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2000, c.75 (C.39:4-97.2). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.